New York, session 2025-2026, A7224.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1370-e of the public health law is amended by 2 adding two new subdivisions 6 and 7 to read as follows: 3 6. The department shall require primary care providers to recommend 4 follow up blood lead level screenings to parents of children whose blood 5 lead levels test at not less than 15 micrograms per deciliter of whole 6 blood up to 24.99 micrograms per deciliter of whole blood. 7 7. If a child's blood level test is above 25 micrograms per deciliter 8 of whole blood, the commissioner or his designee shall take appropriate 9 measures to ensure that an environmental investigation, as required by 10 subpart 67-2 of title ten of the New York state codes, rules and regu- 11 lations, is completed. If the department finds that the investigation 12 has not been completed within one hundred eighty days of its notice of 13 the blood lead level finding, the department shall complete such inves- 14 tigation immediately. The department may take reasonable measures to 15 collect the costs of conducting these assessments from entities 16 originally responsible for conducting them. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11050-01-5